Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Capital Planning Advisory Board

7A.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Capital project” means:

Any undertaking which is to be financed or funded through an appropriation by the General Assembly of general fund, road fund, bond fund, trust and agency fund, or federal fund moneys, where the expenditure is a capital expenditure pursuant to statute or under standards prescribed by the Legislative Research Commission under the authority of KRS Chapter 48;

Any undertaking which is to be financed by a capital expenditure for use by the state government or one of its departments or agencies, as defined in KRS

12.010

or enumerated in KRS

12.020

, including projects related to the construction or maintenance of roads, and including projects of institutions of higher education as defined in KRS 164A.550(2);

Any capital construction item, or any combination of capital construction items necessary to make a building or utility installation complete, estimated to cost:

Except for items of movable equipment, one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more, regardless of the source of funds; or

Any item of movable equipment, estimated to cost two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more, regardless of the source of funds;

Any lease of real property whose value is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more;

Any lease of an item of movable equipment if the total cost of the lease, lease-purchase, or lease with an option to purchase is two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) or more; or

Any new acquisition, upgrade, or replacement of an information technology system estimated to cost one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more;

“Board” means the Capital Planning Advisory Board of the Kentucky General Assembly created by KRS

7A.110

;

“Plan” means the state capital improvement plan provided for by KRS

7A.120

;

“State agency” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau, committee, institution, legislative body, agency, government corporation, or other entity of the executive, judicial, or legislative branch of the state government; and

“Information technology system” means any related computer or telecommunications components that provide a functional system for a specific business purpose and contain one (1) or more of the following:

Hardware;

Software, including application software, systems management software, utility software, or communications software;

Professional services for requirements analysis, system integration, installation, implementation, or data conversion services; or

Digital data products, including acquisition and quality control.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 31, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 188, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2006, ch. 199, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 138, § 1, effective April 27, 2016; 2018 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

7A.100.
Capital Planning Advisory Board of the General Assembly established.

The Capital Planning Advisory Board of the Kentucky General Assembly is established. The members of this board shall represent all three (3) branches of government and are empowered to prepare a comprehensive state capital improvement plan and to make funding recommendations to each branch head as to state spending for capital projects.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

7A.110.
Membership of board — Meetings — Vote required to act.

The Capital Planning Advisory Board of the Kentucky General Assembly shall consist of sixteen (16) members. The manner of appointment and terms of the members of the board shall be as follows:

Four (4) members shall be appointed by the Governor to represent the executive branch of state government. These members shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed.

Four (4) members shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court to represent the judicial branch of state government. These members shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed.

Four (4) members shall represent the legislative branch of state government and shall be appointed and serve as follows:

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint two (2) members, each of whom shall serve while a member of the House for the term for which he has been elected, and one (1) of whom shall be designated co-chair; and

The President of the Senate shall appoint two (2) members, each of whom shall serve while a member of the Senate for the term for which he has been elected, and one (1) of whom shall be designated co-chair.

Four (4) public members shall be appointed from the Commonwealth at large, one (1) by the Governor, one (1) by the Chief Justice, one (1) by the President of the Senate, and one (1) by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The public members shall serve for a term of four (4) years and until their successors are appointed.

Any vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for board meeting agendas and presiding at board meetings.

On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both co-chairs. The board shall meet at least twice during each calendar year.

Members of the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

A majority of the entire membership of the Capital Planning Advisory Board shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 486, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 185, § 8, effective March 31, 2003.

7A.120.
State capital improvement plan.

Every two (2) years, the board shall prepare a state capital improvement plan containing its proposals for state spending for capital projects.

Copies of the plan shall be submitted to the Governor, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission no later than November 1 of each odd-numbered year. The plan shall provide:

A detailed list of all capital projects of the state, including transportation projects as submitted by the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet and approved by the Joint Transportation Committee, which the board recommends be undertaken or continued by any state agency during the six (6) fiscal year period commencing with the upcoming biennial budget, together with information as to the effect of these capital projects on future operating expenses of the Commonwealth, and with recommendations as to the priority of these capital projects and the means of funding them;

The forecast of the board as to the requirements for capital projects of state agencies during the six (6) fiscal year period and for those additional periods, if any, necessary or desirable for adequate presentation of particular capital projects, and a schedule for the planning and implementation or construction for these additional periods;

A schedule for the next biennial budget of recommended appropriations of bond funds from issues of bonds previously authorized;

A review of capital projects which have recently been implemented or completed or are in process of implementation or completion;

Recommendations as to the maintenance of physical properties and equipment of state agencies; and

Any other information that the board deems relevant to the foregoing matters.

Each state agency, excluding the Department of Highways, shall no later than April 15 of each odd-numbered year provide the board with information described in subsection (2) of this section in the form that shall be prescribed by the board.

In addition to information available to the board under the computerized record keeping of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, each state agency shall, when requested, provide the board with supplemental information concerning any real property owned or leased by the agency, including its current or future availability for other state uses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

7A.130.
Public hearings.

The board may conduct public hearings in furtherance of its general purposes at places designated by it, at which hearings it may request the appearance of officials of any state agency and solicit the testimony of interested groups and the general public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 5, effective July 13, 1990.

7A.140.
Administrative regulations.

The board may adopt any administrative regulations necessary to carry out its planning and advisory functions as provided by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 6, effective July 13, 1990.

7A.150.
Legislative Research Commission’s responsibility for staffing and operating costs of board.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS Chapter 7A. Staff and operating costs of the Capital Planning Advisory Board shall be provided from the budget of the Legislative Research Commission.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 41, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

7A.160.
Use of existing studies, surveys, plans, and data.

The board may make use of existing studies, surveys, plans, data, and other materials in the possession of any state agency. Upon request by the board, an agency shall make these materials available to the board so that the board may have current information on the capital plans and programs of the agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

7A.170.
Advisory committees.

The officers and personnel of any state agency and any other person may serve at the request of the board upon any advisory committees that the board may create. State officers and personnel may serve upon these advisory committees without forfeiture of office or employment and with no loss or diminution in the compensation, status, rights, and privileges which they otherwise enjoy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 503, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.